Wisconsin, session 2025, SB745.
do enact as follows:SB745,11Section 1. 995.40 of the statutes is created to read:SB745,2,32995.40 Eligibility of certain individuals who are not U.S. citizens for 3occupational authorization. (1) In this section:SB745,2,44(a) “Affiliated credentialing board” has the meaning given in s. 15.01 (1g).SB745,2,65(b) “Department” has the meaning given in s. 15.01 (5). “Department” 6includes the state superintendent of public instruction.SB745,2,77(c) “Division” has the meaning given in s. 15.01 (6).SB745,2,88(d) “Examining board” has the meaning given in s. 15.01 (7).SB745,2,109(e) “Independent agency” has the meaning given in s. 15.01 (9). “Independent 10agency” includes the commissioner of insurance.SB745,2,1311(f) “Issuing authority” means the department, division, independent agency, 12examining board, section of an examining board, or affiliated credentialing board 13that issues an occupational authorization.SB745,2,1714(g) “Occupational authorization” means any credential, license, certificate, 15permit, registration, or approval that is issued to an individual by any department, 16division, independent agency, examining board, section of an examining board, or 17affiliated credentialing board.SB745,2,2018(2) Pursuant to 8 USC 1621 (d), an individual who is not a U.S. citizen is 19eligible to receive any occupational authorization despite the individual’s 20citizenship status if all of the following apply:SB745,3,21(a) The individual has been granted deferred action under the deferred action 2for childhood arrivals program of the federal department of homeland security.SB745,3,43(b) The individual’s deferred action under the deferred action for childhood 4arrivals program of the federal department of homeland security is not expired.SB745,3,65(c) The individual possesses an unexpired employment authorization 6document issued by the federal department of homeland security.SB745,3,97(3) Nothing in this section affects any requirement or qualification for an 8applicant to obtain an occupational authorization that is not related to the 9citizenship status of the applicant.SB745,3,1610(4) For each individual who applies for an occupational authorization and to 11whom this section applies, the issuing authority shall verify the individual’s 12employment authorization document issued by the federal department of homeland 13security through the systematic alien verification for entitlements program 14operated by the federal department of homeland security or an equivalent program 15designated by the federal department of homeland security prior to issuing an 16occupational authorization.SB745,3,1917(5) If an individual's employment authorization is withdrawn, the individual 18shall cease practice under the individual's occupational authorization and 19immediately notify the issuing authority.SB745,4,820(6) Any occupational authorization issued to an individual to whom this 21section applies shall be valid only for the period of time during which the 22individual’s employment authorization document issued by the federal department 23of homeland security is valid. If an individual's employment authorization expires 1prior to the renewal date specified for the occupational authorization that the 2individual is applying for under state law, the issuing authority shall provide a 3credential expiration date corresponding to the date that the individual's 4employment authorization expires. An individual may renew a credential that 5expires due to the expiration of the individual's employment authorization by 6renewing the individual's employment authorization, notifying the issuing 7authority that his or her employment authorization was renewed, and satisfying 8any other requirements for renewal of the individual's occupational authorization.SB745,4,139(7) An issuing authority may adjust the fees associated with an occupational 10authorization to correspond to the increased cost of collecting numeric identifiers 11for verification that are required under federal law. An issuing authority may only 12adjust fees under this subsection to recoup the exact cost of collecting numeric 13identifiers for verification that are required under federal law.SB745,4,1614(8) Nothing in this section may be construed to grant eligibility to an 15individual for any public benefits other than receiving an occupational 16authorization.SB745,4,2017(9) This section does not apply to any individual who is granted deferred 18action under the deferred action for childhood arrivals program of the federal 19department of homeland security following the effective date of this subsection .... 20[LRB insert date].SB745,4,2121